Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.045

Bonds payable from special assessments—Not subject to refunding.

Bonds payable solely from special assessments or special assessments and a guaranty fund issued on or prior to June 7, 1984, shall not be subject to refunding under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 186 s 69.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.